Utah statutes.
53A-17a-143.   District tax rate -- Increase of local property tax rate --
Termination.
(1)  In addition to the revenues received from the levy imposed by each school
district and authorized by the Legislature under Section  53A-17a-135, a local
school board may increase its tax rate to provide an amount equal to the
difference between the district's anticipated receipts under the entitlement
for the fiscal year from Public Law 81-874 and the amount the district
actually received from this source for the next preceding fiscal year.
(2)  The tax rate for this purpose may not exceed .0008 per dollar of taxable
value in any fiscal year.
(3)  This authorization terminates for each district at the end of the third
year it is used.
(4)  If at the end of a fiscal year the sum of the receipts of a school
district from this special tax rate plus allocation from Public Law 81-874 for
that fiscal year exceeds the amount allocated to the district from Public Law
81-874 for the next preceding fiscal year, the excess funds are carried into
the next succeeding fiscal year and become in that year a part of the
district's contribution to its basic program for operation and maintenance
under the state minimum school finance law.
(5)  During that year the district's required tax rate for the basic program
shall be reduced so that the yield from the reduced tax rate plus the
carryover funds equal the district's required contribution to its basic
program.
(6)  A district that reduces its basic tax rate under this section shall
receive state minimum school program funds as though the reduction in the tax
rate had not been made.
